District of Columbia statutes.
16-526

Judgment against garnishee.

(a)

When a garnishee has admitted credits in his hands, in answer to interrogatories served upon him, or the credits have been found upon an issue made as provided by this chapter, judgment shall be entered against him for the amount of credits admitted or found, not exceeding the plaintiff’s claim, less a reasonable attorney’s fee to be fixed by the court, and costs, and execution may be had thereon. When the credits are not immediately due and payable, execution shall be stayed until they become due.

(b)

When the garnishee has failed to answer the interrogatories served on him, or to appear and show cause why a judgment of condemnation should not be entered, judgment shall be entered against him for the whole amount of the plaintiff’s claim, and costs, and execution may be had thereon.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-526.
1973 Ed., § 16-526.